Hawaii statutes.
§633-29 Fees and costs; waiver. The
fee for issuing summons and copies, trial, judgment, and satisfaction in an
action in the small claims division of the district court shall be not more
than $35. Other fees shall be as prescribed by statute or rule of court. The
judge may waive the prepayment of costs or the payment of costs accruing during
the action upon the sworn statement of the plaintiff or upon other satisfactory
evidence of the plaintiff's inability to pay the costs. [L 1970, c 182, pt of
§1; am L 1971, c 144, §23; gen ch 1985; am L 1990, c 235, §1; am L 1998, c 128,
§5]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next